Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.767

Justices or judges retirement allowance—In lieu of RCW 41.40.620.

(1) In lieu of the retirement allowance provided under RCW 41.40.620, the retirement allowance payable for service as a supreme court justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge, for those justices or judges who elected to participate under RCW 41.40.124(1), shall be equal to three and one-half percent of average final compensation for each year of service earned after the election. The total retirement benefit accrued or purchased under chapter 189, Laws of 2006 in combination with benefits accrued during periods served prior to the election shall not exceed seventy-five percent of average final compensation.

(2) In lieu of the retirement allowance provided under RCW 41.40.620, the retirement allowance payable for service as a supreme court justice, court of appeals judge, or superior court judge, for those justices or judges newly elected or appointed after January 1, 2007, shall be equal to three and one-half percent of average final compensation for each year of service after January 1, 2007. The total retirement benefits accrued under chapter 189, Laws of 2006 in combination with benefits accrued during periods served prior to January 1, 2007, shall not exceed seventy-five percent of average final compensation.

[ 2006 c 189 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 189: See note following RCW 2.14.115.